Washington statutes.
RCW 7.77.110

Standards of professional responsibility and mandatory reporting not affected.

(1) This chapter does not affect the professional responsibility obligations and standards applicable to a lawyer or other licensed professional or relieve a lawyer or other licensed professional from the duty to comply with all applicable professional responsibility obligations and standards.

(2) This chapter does not affect the obligation of a person to report abuse or neglect, abandonment, or exploitation of a child or adult under the law of this state.

(3) Noncompliance with an obligation or prohibition imposed by this chapter does not in itself establish grounds for professional discipline.

[ 2013 c 119 s 12.]